Utah statutes.
63I-1-267.   Repeal dates, Title 67.

(1)  Section 67-1-15 is repealed December 31, 2017.

(2)  Sections 67-1a-10 and 67-1a-11 creating the Commission on Civic and Character Education and establishing its duties are repealed on July 1, 2021.

